Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Issuance of Shares

271B.6-200.
Subscription of shares before incorporation.

A subscription for shares entered into before incorporation shall be irrevocable for six (6) months, unless the subscription agreement provides a longer or shorter period or all the subscribers agree to revocation.

The board of directors may determine the payment terms of subscriptions for shares that were entered into before incorporation, unless the subscription agreement specifies them. A call for payment by the board of directors shall be uniform so far as practicable as to all shares of the same class or series, unless the subscription agreement specifies otherwise.

Shares issued pursuant to subscriptions entered into before incorporation shall be fully paid and nonassessable when the corporation receives the consideration specified in the subscription agreement.

If a subscriber defaults in payment of money or property under a subscription agreement entered into before incorporation, the corporation may collect the amount owed as any other debt. Alternatively, unless the subscription agreement provides otherwise, the corporation may rescind the agreement and may sell the shares if the debt remains unpaid more than twenty (20) days after the corporation sends written demand for payment to the subscriber.

A subscription agreement entered into after incorporation shall be a contract between the subscriber and the corporation subject to KRS

271B.6-210

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 37, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.6-210.
Issuance of shares.

The powers granted in this section to the board of directors may be reserved to the shareholders by the articles of incorporation.

The board of directors may authorize shares to be issued for consideration consisting of any tangible or intangible property or benefit to the corporation, including cash, promissory notes, services performed, contracts for services to be performed, or other securities of the corporation.

Before the corporation issues shares, the board of directors shall determine that the consideration received or to be received for shares to be issued is adequate. That determination by the board of directors is conclusive insofar as the adequacy of consideration for the issuance of shares relates to whether the shares are validly issued, fully paid, and nonassessable.

When the corporation receives the consideration for which the board of directors authorized the issuance of shares in accordance with this section, the shares issued therefor are fully paid and nonassessable. When, and to the extent, consideration for the issuance of shares consists of a promissory note or contract for services or other benefits, the shares shall be fully paid and nonassessable at the time the note is issued or the contract is entered into.

The board of directors, or a committee of the board of directors, may authorize one (1) or more officers of the corporation to approve the issuance, sale, or contract for sale of shares or to determine the designation and relative rights, preferences, and limitations of a class or series of shares, all within limits specifically prescribed by the board of directors or the committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 38, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 9, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 102, § 10, effective November 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137, sec. 179, effective June 26, 2007 provided: The General Assembly finds and declares that the amendment of KRS

271B.6-210

,

271B.6-230

,

271B.7-040

,

271B.7-280

, and

271B.8-080

, as provided for in 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 102, secs. 10, 11, 15, 18, and 19, respectively, are and were effective as of November 15, 2002.

(11/15/02). 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 102, sec. 22, provides that this section “shall take effect November 15, 2002, if a constitutional amendment proposing to amend Sections 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 195, 198, 200, 202, 203, 205, 207 and 208 of the Constitution of Kentucky relating to corporations is enacted by the General Assembly and approved by the voters in the November, 2002 general election.” Otherwise, this section shall be void.

A constitutional amendment proposing to amend 11 of those 13 sections of the Constitution was enacted by the General Assembly and approved by the voters. During the 2002 Regular Session, the General Assembly enacted 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 341, which proposed to amend Sections 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 198, 200, 202, 203, 207, and 208 of the Constitution of Kentucky. The voters approved that amendment in the November, 2002 general elections.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Young, Modernizing Kentucky’s Corporate Laws, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 12.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

271B.6-220.
Liability of shareholders.

A purchaser from a corporation of its own shares shall not be liable to the corporation or its creditors with respect to the shares except to pay the consideration for which the shares were authorized to be issued or specified in the subscription agreement.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a shareholder of a corporation shall not be personally liable for the acts or debts of the corporation except that he or she may become personally liable by reason of his own acts or conduct.

That a corporation has a single shareholder is not a basis for setting aside the rule recited in subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 39, effective January 1, 1989; 2012, ch. 81, § 88, effective July 12, 2012.

271B.6-230.
Share dividends.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, shares may be issued pro rata and without consideration to the corporation’s shareholders or to the shareholders of one (1) or more classes or series. An issuance of shares under this subsection shall be considered a share dividend.

Shares of one (1) class or series may not be issued as a share dividend in respect of shares of another class or series unless:

The articles of incorporation so authorize;

A majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the class or series to be issued approve the issue; or

There are no outstanding shares of the class or series to be issued.

If the board of directors does not fix the record date for determining shareholders entitled to a share dividend, it shall be the date the board of directors authorizes the share dividend.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 40, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 11, effective November 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137, sec. 179, effective June 26, 2007 provided: The General Assembly finds and declares that the amendment of KRS

271B.6-210

,

271B.6-230

,

271B.7-040

,

271B.7-280

, and

271B.8-080

, as provided for in 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 102, secs. 10, 11, 15, 18, and 19, respectively, are and were effective as of November 15, 2002.

(11/15/2002). 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 102, sec. 22, provides that this section “shall take effect November 15, 2002, if a constitutional amendment proposing to amend Sections 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 195, 198, 200, 202, 203, 205, 207 and 208 of the Constitution of Kentucky relating to corporations is enacted by the General Assembly and approved by the voters in the November, 2002 general election.” Otherwise, [this section] shall be void.

A constitutional amendment proposing to amend 11 of those 13 sections of the Constitution was enacted by the General Assembly and approved by the voters. During the 2002 Regular Session, the General Assembly enacted 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 341, which proposed to amend Sections 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 198, 200, 202, 203, 207, and 208 of the Constitution of Kentucky. The voters approved that amendment in the November, 2002 general elections.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Young, Modernizing Kentucky’s Corporate Laws, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 12.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

271B.6-240.
Share options.

A corporation may issue rights, options, or warrants for the purchase of shares of the corporation. The board of directors shall determine the terms upon which the rights, options, or warrants are issued, their form and content, and the terms and conditions upon which and the consideration for which the shares are to be issued.

The board of directors may, by a resolution adopted by the board, authorize one (1) or more officers of the corporation to do one (1) or more of the following:

Designate officers and employees of the corporation or of any of its subsidiaries to receive rights, options, or warrants to be issued by the corporation;

Determine the number of rights, options, or warrants to be issued to each recipient; and

Determine the time or times at or during which rights, options, or warrants may be exercised.

Any resolution adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall specify the total number of rights, options, or warrants the officer or officers may award.

The board of directors shall not authorize an officer to designate himself or herself as a recipient of any rights, options, or warrants.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 41, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 12, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

271B.6-250.
Form and content of certificate.

Shares may but need not be represented by certificates. Unless this chapter or another statute expressly provides otherwise, the rights and obligations of shareholders shall be identical whether or not their shares are represented by certificates.

At a minimum each share certificate shall state on its face:

The name of the issuing corporation and that it is organized under the law of this state;

The name of the person to whom issued; and

The number and class of shares and the designation of the series, if any, the certificate represents.

If the issuing corporation is authorized to issue different classes of shares or different series within a class, the designations, relative rights, preferences, and limitations applicable to each class and the variations in rights, preferences, and limitations determined for each series (and the authority of the board of directors to determine variations for future series) shall be summarized on the front or back of each certificate. Alternatively, each certificate may state conspicuously on its front or back that the corporation will furnish the shareholder this information on request in writing and without charge.

Each share certificate:

Must be signed (either manually or in facsimile) by two (2) officers designated in the bylaws or by the board of directors; and

May bear the corporate seal or its facsimile.

If the person who signed (either manually or in facsimile) a share certificate no longer holds office when the certificate is issued, the certificate shall nevertheless be valid.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 42, effective January 1, 1989.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Sufficiency of evidence as to delivery of stock certificate to complete valid gift of stock. 23 A.L.R.2d 1171.

271B.6-260.
Shares without certificates — Shares of a public benefit corporation.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may authorize the issue of some or all of the shares of any or all of its classes or series without certificates. The authorization shall not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are surrendered to the corporation.

Within a reasonable time after the issue or transfer of shares without certificates, the corporation shall send the shareholder a written statement of the information required on certificates by subsections (2) and (3) of KRS

271B.6-250

and, if applicable, KRS

271B.6-270

.

Any stock certificate issued by a public benefit corporation shall note conspicuously that the corporation is a public benefit corporation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 43, effective January 1, 1989; 2017 ch. 28, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

271B.6-270.
Restrictions on transfer or registration of shares or other securities.

The articles of incorporation, bylaws, an agreement among shareholders, or an agreement between shareholders and the corporation may impose restrictions on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares of the corporation. A restriction shall not affect shares issued before the restriction was adopted unless the holders of the shares are parties to the restriction agreement or voted in favor of the restriction.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares shall be valid and enforceable against the holder, or a transferee of the holder if the restriction is authorized by this section, and the holder or transferee has actual knowledge of the restriction or its existence is noted conspicuously on the front or back of the certificate or is contained in the information statement required by KRS

271B.6-260

(2). Unless so noted or contained, a restriction is not enforceable against a person without knowledge of the restriction.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares shall be authorized:

To maintain the corporation’s status when it is dependent on the number or identity of its shareholders;

To preserve exemptions under federal or state securities law;

In connection with shares issued by the corporation to its officers, directors, employees, or independent contractors, including as equity-based compensation under the Internal Revenue Code; or

For any other reasonable purpose.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares may without limitation:

Obligate the shareholder first to offer the corporation or other persons, separately, consecutively, or simultaneously, an opportunity to acquire the restricted shares;

Obligate the corporation or other persons, separately, consecutively, or simultaneously, to acquire or transfer the restricted shares;

Obligate a shareholder to transfer the restricted shares to the corporation or other persons for an agreed price or a price based on a valuation formula, including an obligation to transfer the shares for an amount equal to the original consideration paid for the shares;

Require the corporation, the holders of any class of its shares, or another person to approve the transfer of the restricted shares, if the requirement is not manifestly unreasonable; or

Prohibit the transfer of the restricted shares to designated persons or classes of persons, if the prohibition is not manifestly unreasonable.

For purposes of this section, “shares” includes a security convertible into or carrying a right to subscribe for or acquire shares.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
44, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, §
13, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 137, §
61, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
61, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

ALR

Uniform Stock Transfer Act: construction and effect of § 15 prohibiting restriction on transfer of shares unless such restriction is stated on the certificate. 29 A.L.R.2d 901.

Right of corporation to refuse to transfer stock on presentation of properly indorsed certificate, because of conflicting rights or claims of one other than transferee. 75 A.L.R.2d 746.

Corporation’s delivery of stock certificate to stockholder as prerequisite of its issuance to him. 16 A.L.R.3d 1015.

271B.6-280.
Expense of issue.

A corporation may pay or allow the expenses of selling or underwriting its shares or other securities, and of organizing or reorganizing the corporation, from the consideration received for shares without thereby rendering such shares or other securities not fully paid or assessable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 45, effective January 1, 1989.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.